Wyoming, session 2025, HB0243.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-1-129(a)(i)(D), 33-15-101(c) and
(e), 33-15-108(h), 33-15-109(a) and (b), 33-15-111,
33-15-114(a)(xii) and (b)(intro), 33-15-115(a)(ii) through
(iv) and by creating a new paragraph (v), 33-15-117,
33-15-119, 33-15-120(a) and (c) through (e),
33-15-121(a)(intro), (i), (iv) and (v), 33-15-128(a)(ii),
(xii)(A) through (C), (xiii), by creating new paragraphs
(xvii) and (xviii) and by renumbering (xvii) as (xix),
33-15-131(d)(i), (ii)(A), (B), (iii)(A), (B), (iv)(A), (B),
(e) and (g) through (j), 33-15-133(a) and 40-28-102(a)(iv)
are amended to read:

HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
1-1-129. Immunity from liability for volunteer health
care professionals; insurance required of nonprofit health
care facility.

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Health care professional" means any of the
following who provide medical or dental diagnosis, care or
treatment:

(D) Dentists, and dental hygienists and
denturists licensed to practice as provided in title 33,
chapter 15 of the Wyoming statutes; and

33-15-101. Board of dental examiners; generally.

(c) No person is eligible to membership on the board
who is not legally qualified to practice; who has not
engaged in the active practice of dentistry in the state of
Wyoming for at least five (5) continuous years immediately
prior to appointment; who does not at the time of his
appointment hold a certificate entitling him to practice
dentistry in the state of Wyoming; and who is not a
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
resident of the state of Wyoming. One (1) appointed member
of the board shall be a dental hygienist who has the
qualifications provided in this act. One (1) appointed
member of the board may be a denturist who has the
qualifications provided in this act. No member shall
succeed himself in office for more than two (2) successive
terms.

(e) Appointments by the governor to the board shall
be made from a list of recommended names submitted by the
Wyoming Dental Association, and Wyoming Dental Hygiene
Association and the Wyoming State Denturist Association if
a denturist serves on the board as follows:

(i) The Wyoming Dental Association shall,
through its secretary, present to the governor within
fifteen (15) days after its regular annual meeting a list
of the names of not less than ten (10) candidates from
which appointments for vacancies on the board occurring
during the ensuing year shall be made; and

(ii) The Wyoming Dental Hygiene Association
shall, through its secretary, present to the governor
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
within fifteen (15) days after its regular annual meeting a
list of not less than three (3) candidates from which
appointments for vacancies on the board occurring during
the ensuing year shall be made;. and

(iii) If a denturist serves on the board, the
Wyoming State Denturist Association shall, through its
secretary, present to the governor within fifteen (15) days
after its regular annual meeting a list of not less than
three (3) candidates from which appointments for vacancies
on the board occurring during the ensuing year shall be
made.

33-15-108. Licensing; qualifications; examinations;
fees.

(h) The board may make and prescribe rules and
regulations for the licensure and practice of dentistry in
the state of Wyoming, not inconsistent with this act. For
purposes of this subsection, "practice of dentistry"
includes the work of dental hygienists, denturists, dental
auxiliaries, dental technicians and dental laboratories.

HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
33-15-109. Renewal license certificate.

(a) On or before December 31 of every second year,
each dentist and denturist licensed to practice dentistry
in this state and wishing to continue in the practice of
dentistry shall submit a license renewal application with
the applicable renewal fee. Any license granted by the
board shall expire if the holder fails to secure the
renewal certificate within three (3) months after the date
that the license renewal application is required to be
submitted.

(b) Any dentist or denturist whose application for
renewal indicates that the dentist or denturist has not
actively practiced dentistry or engaged in teaching
dentistry, or dental hygiene or denturitry for the
preceding five (5) years shall be issued a renewal
certificate only after demonstrating to the board that the
dentist or denturist has maintained the qualifications set
forth in this act. The board may require reexamination if
it finds good cause to believe that the person has not
maintained the professional ability and knowledge required
of an original licensee.
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377

33-15-111. List of licensees filed with board office.

The board shall annually publish a list of all dentists,
and dental hygienists and denturists licensed under this
act. The list shall contain the name and address of each
dentist, and dental hygienist and denturist and such any
other information as the board deems advisable. The board
office shall furnish copies to the public upon request or
by access to the board's website.

33-15-114. Persons deemed to be practicing dentistry;
work authorizations from licensed dentist.

(a) Except as provided by paragraph (xii) of this
subsection, any person is deemed to be practicing dentistry
within the meaning of this act:

(xii) A dental laboratory, or dental technician
or denturist is not practicing dentistry within the meaning
of this act when engaged in the construction, making,
alteration or repairing of bridges, crowns, dentures or
other prosthetic or surgical appliances, or orthodontic
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
appliances if the casts or molds or impressions upon which
the work is constructed have been made by a regularly
licensed and practicing dentist or denturist, and if all
crowns, bridges, dentures or prosthetic appliances,
surgical appliances or orthodontic appliances are returned
to the dentist upon whose order the work is constructed.

(b) Any licensed dentist or denturist who employs or
engages the service of any person, firm or corporation
outside of the dental office to construct, reproduce, make,
alter or repair bridges, crowns, dentures or other
prosthetic, surgical or orthodontic appliances shall
furnish the person with a written work authorization on
forms prescribed by the board, which contain:

33-15-115. Persons to whom chapter inapplicable.

(a) Nothing in this act contained applies:

(ii) To a legally qualified dentist, dental
hygienist or dentist denturist engaged in full-time duties
with the United States armed forces, public health service,
veterans administration or other federal agencies;
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377

(iii) To a legally qualified dental hygienist or
dentist, dental hygienist or denturist of another state
making a clinical demonstration before a meeting of
dentists, denturists, dental hygienists or dental
auxiliaries; or

(iv) To dental, and dental hygiene and
denturitry students actively enrolled in any American
Dental Association or other board-approved accredited
dental or denturitry educational program performing
services as a part of the curriculum of that program under
the direct supervision of a Wyoming licensed dentist, or
Wyoming licensed dental hygienist instructor or Wyoming
licensed denturist; or

(v) To denturitry students actively enrolled in
any accredited educational institution approved by the
board and pursuing a major course of study in denturitry.

33-15-117. Dental laboratory technicians and
denturists.

HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
Dentists may employ one (1) or more dental laboratory
technicians or denturists who work only under the direction
and supervision of the dentist and who shall not be
permitted under any circumstances to do any unsupervised
work upon any patient. Dental laboratory technicians and
denturists shall not be allowed to do laboratory work of
any kind except at the direction of dentists duly licensed
to practice, and then only upon written prescription issued
by the dentists if the dental laboratory work is completed
outside the dental office.

33-15-119. Dental hygienists and denturists;
generally.

Any dentist authorized to practice dentistry within the
state may employ dental hygienists and denturists who shall
be examined and possess the qualifications provided in this
act. A dental hygienist or denturist may perform any
services for a patient which that are consistent with what
the dental hygienists and denturists are trained to do in
accredited dental hygiene or denturitry schools accredited
by the commission on dental accreditation of the American
Dental Association, the National Denturist Association or
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
other board-approved education program. Hygienists and
denturists shall not perform any other operation on the
teeth or mouth and shall be regulated by the rules and
regulations promulgated by the board. The above services
shall be performed under the supervision of a licensed
dentist. Dental hygienists and denturists shall practice in
the office of any licensed dentist, or in any public or
private institution under the supervision of a licensed
dentist. The board may revoke or suspend the license of any
dentist who permits any dental hygienist or denturist
operating under his supervision to perform any operations
or functions other than those permitted under this act.

33-15-120. Dental hygienists and denturists;
qualifications; examination; fees and license.

(a) Any person who has a background that does not
evidence conduct adverse to the practice of dental hygiene
or denturitry or to the ability to practice dental hygiene
who is or denturitry and meets the following qualifications
may apply to the board to have the person's qualifications
considered for licensure to practice dental hygiene or
denturitry as follows:
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377

(i) An applicant for licensure as a dental
hygienist shall be a graduate of a dental hygiene program
accredited by the commission on dental accreditation of the
American Dental Association or other board-approved
program, who has passed a written, clinical and state
examination as determined by rule of the board may apply to
the board to have the person's qualifications considered
for licensure to practice dental hygiene;

(ii) An applicant for licensure as a denturist
shall be a graduate of a denturist program accredited by
the National Denturist Association or other board-approved
educational program, shall pass in a manner satisfactory to
the board an examination for the practice of denturitry
established by the National Denturist Association or other
board-approved examination and shall pass a clinical
examination accepted by the board. Applicants shall be
required to pass a written examination satisfactory to the
board;

(iii) Persons licensed to practice denturitry
under the laws of any other state, territory of the United
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
States, District of Columbia or Puerto Rico, with
substantially equivalent licensing standards to this
chapter applicable to denturitry shall be licensed without
examination upon providing the board with the following:

(A) Proof of successfully passing a written
and clinical examination for denturitry in a state,
territory of the United States, District of Columbia or
Puerto Rico, that the board has determined has
substantially equivalent or stricter licensing standards as
those in this act, including but not limited to, both the
written and clinical examination; and

(B) An affidavit from the licensing agency
where the person is currently licensed or certified
attesting to the fact of the person's licensure or
certification and the person's good standing with the
licensing agency.

(c) If the applicant successfully completes the
requirements for licensure, the applicant shall be licensed
as a dental hygienist or denturist. If the expanded duties
applicant has successfully met the requirements for
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
expanded duties, the applicant shall be certified in those
expanded duties. The certificate issued by the board shall
list the expanded duties which the hygienist or denturist
is qualified and permitted to perform. On or before
December 31 of every second year, each dental hygienist or
denturist licensed to practice dental hygiene or denturitry
and wishing to continue in the practice of dental hygiene
or denturitry shall submit a license renewal application
with the applicable renewal fee. The renewal certificate
shall be made available to the supervising dentist. Any
license granted by the board shall expire if the holder
fails to secure the renewal certificate within three (3)
months after the date that the license renewal application
is required to be submitted. Any license that has expired
may be restored by the board upon payment of a fee set by
the board, if paid by December 31 of the year the license
expired.

(d) Any dental hygienist or denturist whose
application for renewal indicates that the hygienist or
denturist has not actively practiced dental hygiene or
denturitry or engaged in teaching dental hygiene or
denturitry for the preceding five (5) years shall be issued
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
a renewal certificate only after demonstrating to the board
that the hygienist or denturist has maintained the
qualifications set forth in this act. The board may require
reexamination if it finds good cause to believe that the
person has not maintained the professional ability and
knowledge required of an original licensee under this act.

(e) The board shall promulgate reasonable rules and
regulations for the licensure and practice of dental
hygienists and the practice of dental hygiene denturists,
and may prescribe continuing education requirements for
renewal certificates and relicensure.

33-15-121. Grounds and proceedings for suspension of,
revocation of or refusal to renew a license for a dental
hygienist or denturist.

(a) The board may refuse to issue or renew, or may
suspend or revoke, the license of any dental hygienist or
denturist for any of the following causes:

(i) Conviction of, entry of a plea of nolo
contendere to or entry of a deferred prosecution agreement
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
pursuant to W.S. 7-13-301 to a felony or misdemeanor that
relates adversely to the practice of dental hygiene or
denturitry or the ability to practice dental hygiene or
denturitry;

(iv) Renting or loaning to another person the
hygienist's or denturist's license or diploma to be used as
a license or diploma for the other person;

(v) Being unfit or incompetent to practice
dental hygiene or denturitry for any reason, including but
not limited to:

(A) Inability to practice dental hygiene or
denturitry with reasonable skill and safety because of
physical or mental disability or the use of alcohol,
prescription drugs, nonprescription drugs or other
psychoactive substance; or

(B) Performance of unsafe dental hygiene
practice or denturitry practice or failure to conform to
the standards of acceptable professional dental hygiene
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
practice or denturitry practice, whether or not actual
injury results.

33-15-128. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(ii) "Dentistry" means the healing art practiced
by a dentist, dental hygienist or a denturist which is
concerned with the examination, diagnosis, treatment,
planning and care of conditions within the human oral
cavity and its adjacent tissues and structures;

(xii) "Proprietor" includes any person who:

(A) Employs dentists, dental hygienists,
denturists or dental auxiliaries in the operation of a
dental office, except as defined in this act; or

(B) Places in the possession of a dentist,
dental hygienist, or denturist, dental auxiliary or any
other agent such dental material or equipment as may be
necessary for the management of a dental office on the
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
basis of a lease or any other agreement for compensation
for the use of such material, equipment or offices; or

(C) Retains the ownership or control of
dental equipment or material or office and makes the same
available in any manner for the use by dentists, dental
hygienists, denturists, dental auxiliaries or any other
agents, excepting that nothing in this subparagraph shall
apply to bona fide sales of dental equipment or material
secured by a chattel mortgage or retain-title agreement or
the loan of articulators.

(xiii) "Expanded duties" means those patient's
services which that are beyond those regularly practiced by
dental hygienists, or denturists, dental technicians or
other dental auxiliary functions and which that require
additional education, which shall be approved by the board
of dental examiners of Wyoming and are to be performed
under the direct supervision of a licensed dentist;

(xvii) "Denturist" means a person who is
supervised by a dentist and is licensed to render removable
oral prostheses services, education and dentistry services
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
defined in this act, as well as other duties required in
the practice of a denturist's duties;

(xviii) "Denturitry" means the practice of a
denturist who, at the direction and supervision of a
licensed dentist, makes, provides, repairs or alters
removable oral prosthetic appliances and other removable
artificial devices that are inserted into the human mouth
or that come into contact with the human mouth and its
adjacent tissues and structures;

(xvii)(xix) "This act" means W.S. 33-15-101
through 33-15-133 and may be cited as the "Wyoming Dental
Practice Act".

33-15-131. Dentist, dental hygienist or denturist
volunteer certificate.

(d) An application for a volunteer's certificate
shall include all of the following:

(i) A copy of the applicant's dentistry, or
dental hygienist or denturist degree;
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377

(ii) One (1) of the following, as applicable:

(A) A copy of the applicant's most recent
license or certificate authorizing the practice of
dentistry, or dental hygiene or denturitry issued by a
jurisdiction in the United States that licenses persons to
practice dentistry, or dental hygiene or denturitry; or

(B) A copy of the applicant's most recent
license equivalent to a license to practice dentistry, or
dental hygiene or denturitry in one (1) or more branches of
the United States armed services that the United States
government issued.

(iii) Evidence of one (1) of the following, as
applicable:

(A) That the applicant has maintained for
at least ten (10) years immediately prior to retirement
full licensure in good standing in any jurisdiction in the
United States that licenses persons to practice as a
dentist, or dental hygienist or denturist; or
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377

(B) That the applicant has practiced for at
least ten (10) years immediately prior to retirement in
good standing as a dentist, or dental hygienist or
denturist in one (1) or more of the branches of the United
States armed services.; and

(iv) A notarized statement from the applicant,
on a form prescribed by the board, that the applicant:

(A) Will not accept any form of
remuneration for any dental, or dental hygiene or
denturitry services rendered while in possession of a
volunteer's certificate;

(B) Will devote his practice exclusively
and totally to providing dental, or dental hygiene or
denturitry services to low income uninsured persons at a
nonprofit health care facility in this state; and

(e) The holder of a volunteer's certificate may
provide dental, or dental hygiene or denturitry services
only on the premises of a nonprofit health care facility in
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
this state and only to low income uninsured persons. The
holder shall not accept any form of remuneration for
providing dental, or dental hygiene or denturitry services
while in possession of the certificate. The board may
revoke a volunteer's certificate on receiving proof
satisfactory to the board that the holder has engaged in
practice in this state outside the scope of the
certificate.

(g) To be eligible for renewal of a volunteer's
certificate, the holder of the certificate shall certify to
the board completion of any continuing education required
under this act as if the holder of the certificate were in
active practice. The board shall not renew a certificate if
the holder has not complied with the continuing education
requirements. The nonprofit health care facility in which
the holder provides dental, or dental hygiene or denturitry
services may pay for or reimburse the holder for any costs
incurred in obtaining the required continuing education.

(h) The board shall issue to each person who
qualifies under this section a volunteer's certificate that
states the certificate holder is authorized to provide
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
dental, or dental hygiene or denturitry services pursuant
to the laws of this state.

(j) Except as provided in this section, any person
holding a volunteer's certificate issued by the board under
this section shall be subject to the requirements of this
act and the jurisdiction of the board as if he were
licensed to practice dentistry, or dental hygiene or
denturitry under this act.

33-15-133. Temporary educator's license.

(a) A temporary license may be issued to any
denturist, dentist or dental hygienist who has applied for
licensure and who exhibits good standing in another
jurisdiction of the United States or Canada and has
qualified for the requirements to be employed as an
instructor at a dental hygiene or denturitry school.

40-28-102. Medical digital innovation sandbox waiver;
applicability of criminal statutes; referrals; civil
liability.

HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a
person who makes an innovative medical digital assessment
product or service available to consumers in the medical
digital innovation sandbox may be granted a waiver from
specified requirements imposed by statute or rule, or
portions thereof, if these statutes or rules do not
currently permit the product or service to be made
available to consumers. A waiver under this subsection
shall be no broader than necessary to accomplish the
purposes and standards set forth in this act, as determined
by the department or the appropriate licensing board or
authority under the chapters listed in this subsection.
The statutes within the following chapters of title 33 of
the Wyoming statutes, and the rules adopted under them, or
portions thereof, may be waived by the department and the
appropriate licensing boards or authorities, upon receipt
and approval of an application made to the department
pursuant to W.S. 40-28-103:

(iv) Chapter 15, dentists, and dental hygienists
and denturists;

HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
Section 2. There is appropriated eighteen thousand
dollars ($18,000.00) from the board of dental examiners'
account within the special revenue fund to the board of
dental examiners to pay for the administrative costs
incurred by the board of dental examiners to implement this
act. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning
July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2026. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation be included in the standard budget of the
board of dental examiners for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.

Section 3.

(a) If there are three (3) denturist candidates
interested in serving on the board of dental examiners, the
governor may appoint a denturist from the list of three (3)
candidates proposed by the Wyoming State Denturist
Association to the board of dental examiners pursuant to
HB0243

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0377
W.S. 33-51-101, as amended by section 1 of this act, not
later than July 1, 2025.

(b) If the governor appoints a denturist to the board
of dental examiners, the Wyoming State Denturist
Association shall present to the governor a list of not
less than three (3) candidates from which appointments for
vacancies on the board of dental examiners occurring
between the effective date of this section and July 1, 2025
shall be made pursuant to W.S. 33-15-101, as amended by
section 1 of this act.

Section 4.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0243